Massachusetts, session 194th, S1066.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 11I of chapter 12 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following paragraph:-
A private civil right of action shall exist against any individual who knowingly makes a
false call to law enforcement or otherwise intentionally summons a law enforcement officer or
agent, without reason to suspect a violation of a criminal law, any criminal conduct or an
imminent threat to person or property by an individual or group of individuals, in whole or in
part because of a belief or perception of the race, color, national origin, ancestry, gender,
religion, religious practice, age, disability, sexual orientation or gender identity of the individual
or group of individuals. The private civil action may be brought by the individual or group of
individuals for injunctive relief, damages or other appropriate relief. If the court determines in
of 2

any such action that the respondent has violated this section, an injunction may be issued by such
court, enjoining and restraining any further violation, without requiring evidence that any person
has been injured or damaged. For the purposes of this section, a person shall lack reason to
suspect a violation of a criminal law, any criminal conduct or an imminent threat to person or
property if a reasonable person would not suspect such a violation, conduct or threat based on the
totality of the circumstances.
SECTION 2. Section 39 of chapter 265 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by adding the following subsection:-
(c) Whoever knowingly makes a false police report or summons a law enforcement
officer, without reason to suspect a violation of a criminal law, any criminal conduct or an
imminent threat to person or property by an individual or group of individuals, in whole or in
part because of a belief or perception of the race, color, national origin, ancestry, gender,
religion, religious practice, age, disability, sexual orientation or gender identity of the individual
shall be punished by a fine of not more than 5 thousand dollars or by imprisonment in a house of
correction for not more than 2 ½ years or by both such fine and imprisonment. The court may
also order restitution to the victim for property damage in an amount of not more than 3 times the
value of property damage sustained by the owners of such property. For the purposes of this
section, a person shall lack reason to suspect a violation of a criminal law, any criminal conduct
or an imminent threat to person or property if a reasonable person would not suspect such a
violation, conduct or threat based on the totality of the circumstances.
of 2